local/incubator/apertium-br-fr.br.dix
    <pardef n="etre__pr">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zon</l>
          <r><s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zout</l>
          <r><s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zañ</l>
          <r><s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zi</l>
          <r><s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zomp</l>
          <r><s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zoc’h</l>
          <r><s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zo</l>
          <r><s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="dira/k__pr">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>k</l>
          <r>k<s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zon</l>
          <r>k<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zout</l>
          <r>k<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zañ</l>
          <r>k<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zi</l>
          <r>k<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zomp</l>
          <r>k<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zoc’h</l>
          <r>k<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zo</l>
          <r>k<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/diwar__pr">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>diwar</l>
          <r>diwar<s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>diwarnon</l>
          <r>diwar<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>diwarnout</l>
          <r>diwar<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>diwarnañ</l>
          <r>diwar<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>diwarnezhañ</l>
          <r>diwar<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>diwarni</l>
          <r>diwar<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>diwarnezhi</l>
          <r>diwar<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>diwarnomp</l>
          <r>diwar<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>diwarnoc’h</l>
          <r>diwar<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>diwarno</l>
          <r>diwar<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>diwarnezho</l>
          <r>diwar<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="d/a__pr">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>in</l>
          <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>it</l>
          <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ezhañ</l>
          <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ezhi</l>
          <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>imp</l>
          <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eoc’h</l>
          <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ezho</l>
          <r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="etrezek__pr">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>ennon</l>
          <r><s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>ennout</l>
          <r><s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>ennañ</l>
          <r><s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>enni</l>
          <r><s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>ennomp</l>
          <r><s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>ennoc’h</l>
          <r><s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>enno</l>
          <r><s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="etre"><i>etre</i><par n="etre__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="dirak"><i>dira</i><par n="dira/k__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="diwar"><i></i><par n="/diwar__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="da"><i>d</i><par n="d/a__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="etrezek"><i>etrezek</i><par n="etrezek__pr"/></e>
